Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE B. PROCEDURAL MATTERS

CHAPTER 54. PLEADINGS AND EVIDENCE IN GENERAL

SUBCHAPTER A. PLEADINGS

Sec. 54.001. EFFECT OF FILING OR CONTESTING PLEADING. (a) The filing or contesting in probate court of a pleading relating to a decedent's estate does not constitute tortious interference with inheritance of the estate.

(b) This section does not abrogate any right of a person under Rule 13, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, or Chapter 10, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 54.002. DEFECT IN PLEADING. A court may not invalidate a pleading in probate, or an order based on the pleading, on the basis of a defect of form or substance in the pleading unless a timely objection has been made against the defect and the defect has been called to the attention of the court in which the proceeding was or is pending.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. EVIDENCE

Sec. 54.051. APPLICABILITY OF CERTAIN RULES RELATING TO WITNESSES AND EVIDENCE. Except as provided by Section 51.203, the Texas Rules of Evidence apply in a proceeding arising under this title to the extent practicable.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1136 (H.B. 2912), Sec. 7, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 54.052. USE OF CERTAIN RECORDS AS EVIDENCE. The following are admissible as evidence in any court of this state:

(1) record books described by Sections 52.001, 52.002, and 52.003 and individual case files described by Section 52.052, including records maintained in a manner allowed under Section 52.004; and

(2) certified copies or reproductions of the records.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 680, Sec. 1, eff. January 1, 2014.